Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1336
Affidavit made in bad faith.

Should it appear to the satisfaction of the court at any time that any of the affidavits presented pursuant to sections 25-1330 to 25-1336 are presented in bad faith or solely for the purpose of delay, the court shall forthwith order the party employing them to pay to the other party the amount of the reasonable expenses which the filing of the affidavits caused him to incur, including reasonable attorney's fees, and any offending party or attorney may be adjudged guilty of contempt.

Laws 1951, c. 65, § 7, p. 200.